Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [148.785] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply. new text end new text begin (b) "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve. new text end new text begin (c) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws that is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against a licensee, including actions against an individual's license or compact privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee's authorization to practice. new text end new text begin (d) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to an athletic trainer approved by a state licensing authority of a member state in which the athletic trainer is licensed. This includes but is not limited to programs to which licensees with substance use, addiction, or mental health conditions are referred in lieu of adverse action. new text end new text begin (e) "Athletic training" means the prevention, examination, assessment, treatment, and rehabilitation of emergent, acute, or chronic injuries and medical conditions as defined by applicable member state laws and regulations. new text end new text begin (f) "Athletic Trainer Compact Commission" or "compact commission" means the government agency whose membership consists of all states that have enacted this compact, as described herein and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states to administer and implement the compact according to its terms. new text end new text begin (g) "BOC" means the Board of Certification, Incorporated or any successor organization thereto. new text end new text begin (h) "CAATE" means the Commission on Accreditation of Athletic Training Education or any successor organization thereto. new text end new text begin (i) "Charter member state" means any member state that enacted and made effective this compact by law before the compact effective date specified herein. new text end new text begin (j) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a member state to serve as the member of the commission for that member state. new text end new text begin (k) "Compact privilege" means the legal authorization granted by a remote state, equivalent to a license, allowing a licensee from another member state to provide athletic training services in a remote state. new text end new text begin (l) "Compact qualifying license" means a license that is not an encumbered license issued by a member state to practice athletic training that qualifies the licensee to exercise a compact privilege pursuant to section 148.7852. new text end new text begin (m) "Continuing competence" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of successful participation, and completion of, educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of work. For purposes of this compact, evidence of active BOC certification may satisfy the meaning of continuing competence as set forth herein. new text end new text begin (n) "Current significant investigative information" means the existence of: new text end new text begin (1) investigative information that a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject licensee to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or new text end new text begin (2) investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond. new text end new text begin (o) "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 28, section 20.3(d), from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the state's criminal history record repository as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 28, section 20.3(f). new text end new text begin (p) "Data system" means the commission's repository of information about licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege, adverse action, and alternative program. new text end new text begin (q) "Encumbrance" or "encumbered" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice of athletic training. new text end new text begin (r) "Executive committee" means a group of commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the compact and commission. new text end new text begin (s) "Investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investigation. new text end new text begin (t) "Jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment of an individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of athletic training, as applicable, in a state. new text end new text begin (u) "License" means current authorization by a member state to engage in the practice of athletic training. new text end new text begin (v) "Licensee" or "licensed athletic trainer" means an individual who currently holds an active, unrestricted license and who meets all of the requirements outlined in section 148.7852. new text end new text begin (w) "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of athletic trainers. new text end new text begin (x) "Model compact language" means the model language for the Athletic Trainer Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by the commission to which all member states must substantively adhere and adopt. new text end new text begin (y) "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact. new text end new text begin (z) "Remote state" means a member state other than the state of qualifying licensure. new text end new text begin (aa) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an authorized entity that has the force of law. new text end new text begin (bb) "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes an athletic trainer licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under which the licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be established through means including but not limited to statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the state licensing authority or other government agency. Scope of practice shall include any state requirements regarding supervision or direction, if required by such state and as further defined by such state's statutes and regulations. new text end new text begin (cc) "Single state license" means a license issued by any state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state. new text end new text begin (dd) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of America. new text end new text begin (ee) "State of qualifying licensure" means the member state that has issued a compact qualifying license to a licensee pursuant to this compact. new text end new text begin (ff) "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of athletic training. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [148.7851] STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible to join this compact and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a state must: new text end new text begin (1) enact and maintain a statute that is not materially different from the model compact language; new text end new text begin (2) license and regulate the practice of athletic training; new text end new text begin (3) require that licensees in that state maintain continuing competence standards as part of their state practice act or rules; new text end new text begin (4) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensees; new text end new text begin (5) grant the compact privilege to a licensee who meets all the requirements outlined in section 148.7852 in accordance with the terms of the compact and any rules promulgated thereunder; new text end new text begin (6) participate fully in the compact commission's data system, including using the unique identifier as defined in rules; new text end new text begin (7) notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of current significant investigative information regarding a licensee; new text end new text begin (8) within a time frame established by rule, implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for a compact qualifying license which includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results in making licensure decisions. These procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records and: new text end new text begin (i) a member state must fully implement a criminal background check requirement in order to participate in the issuance and acceptance of compact privileges; and new text end new text begin (ii) communication between a member state and the compact commission or among member states regarding the verification of eligibility for licensure through the compact shall not include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check performed by a member state; and new text end new text begin (9) comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission. new text end new text begin (b) Member states may set and collect a fee for issuance and renewal of a compact privilege to applicants. new text end new text begin (c) Individuals without a compact qualifying license shall continue to be able to apply for a member state's single state license as provided under the laws of each member state. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a single state license. new text end new text begin (e) A compact qualifying license shall be recognized by each remote state as authorizing that licensee to engage in the practice of athletic training, under a compact privilege, in another member state in accordance with the requirements in section 148.7852. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [148.7852] COMPACT PRIVILEGE. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for a compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the compact, the licensee shall complete a criminal background check performed by the licensing authority in the state of qualifying licensure prior to entry in the compact and shall: new text end new text begin (1) satisfy one of the following two pathways: new text end new text begin (i) hold a valid current active certification through the BOC, or its successor organization; or new text end new text begin (ii) if a licensee does not meet the requirements of item (i), the following must be completed: new text end new text begin (A) an education program which is either: new text end new text begin 1. at least a bachelor's degree with a major course of study in athletic training, or an equivalent course of study from a college or university accredited at the time of graduation by CAATE, or its successor organization; new text end new text begin 2. an academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country equivalent to the degree described in 1 of this subitem with a major course of study as described in 1 of this subitem that is accredited by CAATE, or its successor organization; or new text end new text begin 3. the substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the commission may determine by rule; and new text end new text begin (B) successful completion of the exam administered by the BOC, or its successor organization, preceding the date of the licensee's application for licensure in their state of qualifying licensure or the substantial equivalent of the foregoing requirement which the commission may determine by rule; new text end new text begin (2) hold a compact qualifying license; new text end new text begin (3) have not had any encumbrance against any license or compact privilege to practice athletic training within the previous two years; new text end new text begin (4) be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state in accordance with this section; new text end new text begin (5) notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a remote state or states; new text end new text begin (6) pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege; new text end new text begin (7) meet only the continuing competence requirements established by the state of qualifying licensure; new text end new text begin (8) comply with any requirements of the state of qualifying licensure as set forth in section 148.7851; new text end new text begin (9) meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state or states in which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and new text end new text begin (10) report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance, or restriction on a license taken by any nonmember state within 30 days from the date the action is taken. new text end new text begin (b) The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the compact qualifying license. To maintain a compact privilege, renewal of the compact privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the compact qualifying license as the compact commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the requirements of this section to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state. A licensee may apply for and hold compact privileges in multiple member states. new text end new text begin (c) A licensed athletic trainer must follow the scope of practice of the member state where the patient is located. A licensee engaging in the practice of athletic training in a remote state under the compact privilege shall adhere to the scope of practice laws and regulations of the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves on, and complying with, any and all scope of practice laws and regulations and state laws relating to the remote practice of athletic training, as applicable. new text end new text begin (d) A licensee engaging in the practice of athletic training in a remote state is subject to that state's regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state's laws, remove a licensee's compact privilege in the remote state for a specific period of time, impose fines, or take any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. Any member state that undertakes such an action shall promptly notify the member state and the commission as specified in the rules. The licensee may be deemed to be ineligible to exercise the compact privilege by any member state until the specific time for removal has passed and all fines are paid. new text end new text begin (e) All member state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a compact qualifying license shall result in deactivation of the licensee's compact privilege in all member states during the pendency of the order. If a compact qualifying license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following occur: new text end new text begin (1) the compact qualifying license is no longer encumbered; and new text end new text begin (2) the licensee has not had any encumbrance or restriction against any license, compact qualifying license, or compact privilege within the previous two years. new text end new text begin (f) Once an encumbered license is restored to good standing as a compact qualifying license, as certified by the licensing authority, the licensee must meet the requirements of this section to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state. new text end new text begin (g) If a licensee's compact privilege in any remote state is removed, that licensee may also lose the compact privilege in other remote states, as each member state shall determine in its sole authority, until the following occur: new text end new text begin (1) the specific period of time for which the compact privilege was removed has ended; new text end new text begin (2) all fines have been paid; and new text end new text begin (3) the licensee has not had any encumbrance or restriction against any license or compact privilege within the previous two years. new text end new text begin (h) Once the requirements of paragraph (g) have been met, the licensee must meet the requirements in paragraph (a) to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [148.7853] COMPACT QUALIFYING LICENSE. new text end new text begin (a) A licensee may only designate one license as their compact qualifying license at a time. The procedures for such designation may be further defined by compact commission rule. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section shall require that the state of qualifying licensure be the state of primary residence or state of primary practice for the licensee. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee's ability to hold a single state license in multiple states. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a single state license. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [148.7854] ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSES. new text end new text begin An active military member or their spouse shall not be required to pay a fee to the commission for a compact privilege. If a member state chooses to charge a member state fee, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an active military member or their spouse for a compact privilege. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [148.7855] ADVERSE ACTIONS. new text end new text begin (a) A member state in which a licensee is issued a compact qualifying license shall have the exclusive authority to impose adverse action against the compact qualifying license issued by that member state. new text end new text begin (b) A member state may take adverse action based on current significant investigative information of a remote state, so long as the member state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this compact shall override a member state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the member state's laws or rules. new text end new text begin (d) A remote state shall have the authority to: new text end new text begin (1) take adverse actions as set forth herein against a licensee's compact privilege in that state; and new text end new text begin (2) issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence: new text end new text begin (i) subpoenas may be issued by a member state athletic training licensing authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence; new text end new text begin (ii) a member state that issues a subpoena may request service of that subpoena by another member state. The member state receiving the request to serve a subpoena shall serve the subpoena if it is deemed enforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction according to the practice and procedure in the receiving member state; and new text end new text begin (iii) the issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located. new text end new text begin (e) For purposes of taking adverse action, a member state shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from another member state as it would if the conduct had occurred within that state. In so doing, the investigating member state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action. new text end new text begin (f) A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee. new text end new text begin (g) Joint investigations: new text end new text begin (1) in addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state law, any member state may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees; new text end new text begin (2) member states shall share any current significant investigative information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact. In sharing such information between member state athletic trainer licensing authorities, all information obtained shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and receiving member state or states; and new text end new text begin (3) a remote state may issue subpoenas on behalf of a member state for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. new text end new text begin (h) If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify all member states of any adverse actions by remote states. new text end new text begin (i) Nothing in this compact may permit a member state to take any adverse action against a licensee or holder of a compact privilege for conduct or practice occurring in another member state that was legal in the member state at the time it was undertaken. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [148.7856] ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION. new text end new text begin (a) The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the compact known as the Athletic Trainer Compact Commission. The compact commission is an instrumentality of the member states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state. The compact commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in section 148.786. new text end new text begin (b) Membership, voting, and meetings: new text end new text begin (1) each member state shall have and be limited to one commissioner selected by that member state's licensing authority within 60 days of the member state's effective date; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated staff or current board member of the licensing authority; new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any commissioner from office; new text end new text begin (4) a member state's licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its commissioner occurring on the compact commission within 60 days of the vacancy; new text end new text begin (5) each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the compact commission requiring a vote by the commissioners; and new text end new text begin (6) the compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the commission bylaws. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissioners to meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication. new text end new text begin (c) The compact commission shall have the following powers: new text end new text begin (1) promulgate, adopt, and amend rules and bylaws; new text end new text begin (2) establish code of conduct, confidentiality, and conflict of interest policies for commissioners; new text end new text begin (3) establish the fiscal year of the compact commission; new text end new text begin (4) maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws; new text end new text begin (5) purchase and maintain insurance and insurance bonds; new text end new text begin (6) accept or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a member state; new text end new text begin (7) conduct a financial review or audit; new text end new text begin (8) hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the compact commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters; new text end new text begin (9) enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the affairs of the commission; new text end new text begin (10) assess and collect fees; new text end new text begin (11) accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the compact commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; new text end new text begin (12) lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, invest, or use any real, personal, or mixed property or any undivided interest therein; new text end new text begin (13) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any real, personal, or mixed property; new text end new text begin (14) establish a budget and make expenditures; new text end new text begin (15) borrow and invest money; new text end new text begin (16) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact, the compact commission's rules, and the bylaws; new text end new text begin (17) initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the compact commission, provided that the standing of any licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected; new text end new text begin (18) maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the authenticated business records of the compact commission and designate an agent to do so on the compact commission's behalf; new text end new text begin (19) provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; new text end new text begin (20) determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact; new text end new text begin (21) establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other offices as the commission shall establish by rule or bylaw; new text end new text begin (22) appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of member state commissioners, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws; and new text end new text begin (23) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact. new text end new text begin (d) The executive committee: new text end new text begin (1) the executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the compact commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall include: new text end new text begin (i) exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission during the interim between compact commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the compact commission by rule or bylaw; new text end new text begin (ii) oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact, including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary; new text end new text begin (iii) recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees; new text end new text begin (iv) ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by contract; new text end new text begin (v) prepare and recommend the budget; new text end new text begin (vi) maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commission; new text end new text begin (vii) monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the compact commission; new text end new text begin (viii) establish additional committees as necessary; and new text end new text begin (ix) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact commission; new text end new text begin (2) the executive committee shall be composed of five voting members, elected by the compact commission: new text end new text begin (i) the chair and vice chair of the compact commission shall be voting members of the executive committee; new text end new text begin (ii) the compact commission shall elect up to three additional voting members from the current membership of the compact commission to include the offices of treasurer, secretary, and one member-at-large; and new text end new text begin (iii) up to four ex-officio, nonvoting members from recognized national athletic trainer organizations; new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission may remove any member of the executive committee as provided in the compact commission's bylaws; and new text end new text begin (4) the executive committee shall meet at least annually: new text end new text begin (i) executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the executive committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in this section; new text end new text begin (ii) the executive committee shall give advance notice of its meetings, posted on its website and as determined by rule or bylaw to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the compact commission; and new text end new text begin (iii) the executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with this section. new text end new text begin (e) The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report. new text end new text begin (f) Meetings of the compact commission: new text end new text begin (1) all meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact commission may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in this section; new text end new text begin (2) public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in this compact, except that the compact commission may hold a special meeting as provided in this section; new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours' notice to all commissioners on the compact commission's website and other means as provided in the compact commission's rules. The compact commission's legal counsel shall certify that the compact commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency; new text end new text begin (4) the compact commission or the executive committee or other committees of the compact commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the compact commission or executive committee or other committees of the compact commission to receive legal advice or to discuss: new text end new text begin (i) noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact; new text end new text begin (ii) the employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees; new text end new text begin (iii) current or threatened discipline of a licensee by a member state's licensing authority; new text end new text begin (iv) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation; new text end new text begin (v) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate; new text end new text begin (vi) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; new text end new text begin (vii) trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; new text end new text begin (viii) information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; new text end new text begin (ix) investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; new text end new text begin (x) information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the compact commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; new text end new text begin (xi) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or new text end new text begin (xii) other matters as specified in rules of the compact commission; and new text end new text begin (5) if a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the compact commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the compact commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (g) Financing of the compact commission: new text end new text begin (1) the compact commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities; new text end new text begin (2) the compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided in this section; new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the compact commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by rule; new text end new text begin (4) the compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds or a loan adequate to meet the same; nor shall the compact commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state; and new text end new text begin (5) the compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the compact commission shall be subject to the financial review or audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the compact commission shall be subject to an annual financial review or audit by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review or audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the compact commission. new text end new text begin (h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification: new text end new text begin (1) the members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the compact commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the compact commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder; new text end new text begin (2) the compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the compact commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the compact commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense, and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct; new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the compact commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person; new text end new text begin (4) nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws; new text end new text begin (5) nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member state's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation; and new text end new text begin (6) nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the member states or by the compact commission. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [148.7857] DATA SYSTEM. new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated data system and reporting system containing licensure, compact privileges, adverse action, and the presence of current significant investigative information on all licensees and applicants for a license in member states. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all licensees, applicants, and others to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the compact commission, including: new text end new text begin (1) personally identifying information; new text end new text begin (2) licensure data; new text end new text begin (3) adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant, or compact privilege and information related thereto; new text end new text begin (4) nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation; new text end new text begin (5) any denial of an application for licensure and the reasons for such denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law; new text end new text begin (6) a binary determination regarding the presence of current significant investigative information; and new text end new text begin (7) other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the commission. new text end new text begin (c) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact or through the data system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the commission and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state. new text end new text begin (d) Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be available to other member states. new text end new text begin (e) It is the responsibility of the member states to monitor the data system to determine whether adverse action has been taken against a licensee or license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or license applicant in any member state will be available to any other member state. new text end new text begin (f) Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state. new text end new text begin (g) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [148.7858] RULEMAKING. new text end new text begin (a) The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the compact commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review. new text end new text begin (b) The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in each member state, provided however that where the rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a member state that relate to the scope of practice a licensed athletic trainer is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the compact commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict. new text end new text begin (c) The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules of this compact shall become binding on the day following adoption or as of the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later. new text end new text begin (d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. new text end new text begin (e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact commission. new text end new text begin (f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments. At least 30 days in advance of the public hearing on the proposed rule, the compact commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking: new text end new text begin (1) on the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessible platform; new text end new text begin (2) to persons who have requested notice of the compact commission's notices of proposed rulemaking; and new text end new text begin (3) in such other ways as the compact commission may by rule specify. new text end new text begin (g) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include: new text end new text begin (1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the compact commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the compact commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule; new text end new text begin (2) if the hearing is held via telecommunication, videoconference, or other electronic means, the mechanism for access to the hearing; new text end new text begin (3) the text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore; new text end new text begin (4) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and new text end new text begin (5) the manner in which interested persons may submit written comments. new text end new text begin (h) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and documents received by the compact commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the public. new text end new text begin (i) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the compact commission at hearings required by this section. new text end new text begin (j) The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule: new text end new text begin (1) the compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule; new text end new text begin (2) the compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters; and new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule. Except for an emergency as provided in this section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule. new text end new text begin (k) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: new text end new text begin (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare; new text end new text begin (2) prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds; new text end new text begin (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law or rule; or new text end new text begin (4) protect public health and safety. new text end new text begin (l) The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the compact commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the compact commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the compact commission. new text end new text begin (m) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [148.7859] OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin (a) Oversight: new text end new text begin (1) the executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the compact; new text end new text begin (2) except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the compact commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the compact commission is located. The compact commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter; and new text end new text begin (3) the compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the compact commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the compact commission, this compact, or promulgated rules. new text end new text begin (b) Default, technical assistance, and termination: new text end new text begin (1) if the compact commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the compact commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default; and new text end new text begin (2) the compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member states. new text end new text begin (c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. new text end new text begin (d) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the compact commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, the defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of the member states' licensing authority. new text end new text begin (e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. new text end new text begin (f) Upon the termination of a state's membership from this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses and compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of termination. new text end new text begin (g) The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the compact commission and the defaulting state. new text end new text begin (h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (i) Dispute resolution: new text end new text begin (1) upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states; and new text end new text begin (2) the compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate. new text end new text begin (j) Enforcement: new text end new text begin (1) by two-thirds majority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal action against a member state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the compact commission. The compact commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state's law; new text end new text begin (2) a member state may initiate legal action against the compact commission in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees; and new text end new text begin (3) no person other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the compact commission. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [148.786] EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT. new text end new text begin (a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state: new text end new text begin (1) on or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven member states ("charter member states") to determine if the statute enacted and made effective by each such charter member state is materially different than the model compact statute: new text end new text begin (i) a charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model compact language shall be entitled to the default process set forth in section 148.7859; and new text end new text begin (ii) if any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the compact commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of member states should be fewer than seven; new text end new text begin (2) member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven initial charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in this section to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the compact; new text end new text begin (3) all actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the compact commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact commission unless specifically repudiated by the compact commission; and new text end new text begin (4) any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commission's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the compact commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state. new text end new text begin (b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same: new text end new text begin (1) a member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute; new text end new text begin (2) withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal; new text end new text begin (3) upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees and privilege holders within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal; new text end new text begin (4) nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact; and new text end new text begin (5) this compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [148.7861] CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY. new text end new text begin (a) This compact and the compact commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the compact commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes. new text end new text begin (b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state seeking participation in the compact, or the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the compact commission may deny a state's participation in the compact or terminate a member state's participation in the compact if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [148.7862] CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact. new text end new text begin (b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. new text end new text begin (c) All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. new text end